Hawaii statutes.
ARTICLE
10C

MOTOR
VEHICLE INSURANCE

PART I.
GENERAL PROVISIONS

Cross References

Applicability of article to captive insurers, see
§431:19-115.5.

Law Journals and Reviews

Tort and Insurance "Reform" in a Common Law Court.
14 UH L. Rev. 55.

Case Notes

Rent-a-car company's rental agreement provision, which
attempted to shift primary responsibility for providing minimum insurance
coverage to the renter's personal insurance policy, violated the public policy
enumerated in this chapter. 88 H. 274, 965 P.2d 1274.

The owner of a vehicle has the primary obligation to provide
minimum coverage for the owned vehicle and this obligation may not be avoided
through a unilateral contract with a permissive user of the vehicle. 88 H.
274, 965 P.2d 1274.

When a defendant is charged with a violation of this article,
§805-13 is the proper procedural statute for the district court, enforcement
officers, and the prosecutor's office to follow. 86 H. 331 (App.), 949 P.2d
171.

As §1-1 does not establish the supremacy of the 1840
Constitution over the current state constitution, or somehow render the
documents concurrent, whether chapter 431 violated the 1840 Constitution was
immaterial for purposes of defendant's conviction. 90 H. 130 (App.), 976 P.2d
444.

§431:10C-101 Short title. This article
shall be known and may be cited as the Hawaii motor vehicle insurance law. [L
1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next